Vermont, session 2025-2026, S261.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 12 V.S.A. § 5792 is amended to read:
§ 5792. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(2)(A) “Land” means:
(i) open and undeveloped land, including paths and trails;
(ii) water, including springs, streams, rivers, ponds, lakes, and
other water courses;
VT LEG #385935 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.261
2026 Page 2 of 2
(iii) fences; or
(iv) structures and fixtures used to enter or go upon land,
including bridges and walkways; and
(v) railroad property, railroad rights-of-way, and utility corridors
to which public access is permitted.
(B) “Land” does not include:
(i) areas developed for commercial recreational uses;
(ii) equipment, machinery, or personal property; and
(iii) structures and fixtures not described in subdivision (A)(iii) or
(iv) of this subdivision (2).
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385935 v.1